Maryland, session 2026, HB0995.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1–231.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT TASKS” INCLUDES:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0995*

HOUSE BILL 995
(I) SCHEDULING APPOINTMENTS;
(II) MANAGING PATIENT RECORDS AND BILLING RECORDS;
(III) BILLING PATIENTS OR INSURERS;
(IV) ANALYZING DATA FOR OPERATIONAL PURPOSES; AND
(V) ORGANIZING, TRACKING, AND MANAGING FILES OR NOTES
THAT RELATE TO A PATIENT’S SESSION.
(3) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(4) “BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7.5–101 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(5) “BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS LICENSED, REGISTERED, OR CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE AND WHOSE
SCOPE OF PRACTICE INCLUDES THE PROVISION OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE
SERVICES.
(6) (I) “THERAPEUTIC COMMUNICATION” MEANS ANY VERBAL OR
WRITTEN INTERACTION BETWEEN A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER AND A
PATIENT THAT IS INTENDED TO DIAGNOSE, TREAT, OR ADDRESS A PATIENT’S
EMOTIONAL OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH.
(II) “THERAPEUTIC COMMUNICATION” INCLUDES:
1. DIRECT INTERACTIONS WITH CLIENTS FOR THE
PURPOSE OF UNDERSTANDING OR REFLECTING THEIR THOUGHTS, EMOTIONS, OR
EXPERIENCES;
2. THE PROVISION OF GUIDANCE, THERAPEUTIC
STRATEGIES, OR INTERVENTIONS DESIGNED TO ACHIEVE MENTAL HEALTH
OUTCOMES;
3. THE OFFERING OF EMOTIONAL SUPPORT,
REASSURANCE, OR EMPATHY IN RESPONSE TO PSYCHOLOGICAL OR EMOTIONAL
DISTRESS;
4. COLLABORATION WITH CLIENTS TO DEVELOP OR
MODIFY THERAPEUTIC GOALS OR TREATMENT PLANS; AND

HOUSE BILL 995 3
5. THE OFFERING OF BEHAVIORAL FEEDBACK
INTENDED TO PROMOTE PSYCHOLOGICAL GROWTH OR ADDRESS MENTAL HEALTH
CONDITIONS.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY NOT USE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO
PROVIDE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE TO A PATIENT, INCLUDING FOR:
(1) ASSESSMENT, DIAGNOSIS, TREATMENT, OR COUNSELING;
(2) DEVELOPMENT OF A TREATMENT PLAN;
(3) CASE MANAGEMENT; OR
(4) THERAPEUTIC COMMUNICATIONS.
(C) (1) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY USE A SYSTEM THAT
EMPLOYS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO ASSIST THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER IN PERFORMING ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT TASKS IF THE BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER:
(I) ENSURES COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE FEDERAL
AND STATE LAWS AND REGULATIONS GOVERNING PATIENT CONFIDENTIALITY AND
THE SECURITY OF HEALTH RECORDS, HEALTH–RELATED INFORMATION, AND OTHER
RELATED DATA;
(II) SIGNS AN AGREEMENT WITH THE PERSON THAT OWNS THE
SYSTEM THAT EMPLOYS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO ENSURE THAT:
1. PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION WILL BE KEPT
CONFIDENTIAL; AND
2. INFORMATION ACCESSED THROUGH THE USE OF THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE MAY NOT BE USED TO TRAIN THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE OR ANY OTHER ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE; AND
(III) PROVIDES WRITTEN AND VERBAL NOTICE TO EACH
PATIENT:
1. THAT THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
MAY USE A SYSTEM THAT EMPLOYS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO PERFORM
ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT TASKS; AND

HOUSE BILL 995
2. OF THE POTENTIAL RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE USE
OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, INCLUDING THE POTENTIAL FOR A BREACH OF
CONFIDENTIALITY.
(2) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER THAT USES A SYSTEM
THAT EMPLOYS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE FOR ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT TASKS
SHALL INDEPENDENTLY REVIEW THE ACCURACY OF ANY REPORT, DATA, OR ANY
OTHER INFORMATION THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE COMPILES, SUMMARIZES,
ANALYZES, OR GENERATES.
(D) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL OBTAIN WRITTEN
INFORMED CONSENT FROM EACH PATIENT IF THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER USES A SYSTEM THAT EMPLOYS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE THAT COULD
MATERIALLY AFFECT CLINICAL DECISION–MAKING SERVICES OR PATIENT–FACING
SERVICES.
(E) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO DISCIPLINARY
ACTION BY THE APPROPRIATE HEALTH OCCUPATION BOARD.
(F) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER FROM DISSEMINATING SELF–HELP MATERIALS OR EDUCATIONAL
MATERIALS THAT DO NOT CLAIM TO PROVIDE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.